Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-314
Veterans homes; director; duties; rules and regulations.

Effective July 1, 2017, all programs, services, and duties of the Division of Veterans’ Homes of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be transferred to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The department shall be responsible for the management and administration of the veterans homes and the treatment of the members thereof, define the duties of the officers, fix their compensation, and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations. The director shall develop member grievance procedures, family support programs, volunteer support, policy, and internal standards. The director shall have access to all confidential information relating to members' care.

Laws 1887, c. 82, § 6, p. 626;

Laws 1891, c. 49, § 3, p. 343;

Laws 1893, c. 33, § 1, p. 361;

Laws 1905, c. 145, § 2, p. 586;

R.S.1913, § 7305;

C.S.1922, § 6960;

Laws 1923, c. 183, § 1, p. 424;

C.S.1929, § 80-304;

R.S.1943, § 80-304;

Laws 1949, c. 272, § 3(1), p. 893;

Laws 1959, c. 420, § 2, p. 1416;

Laws 1980, LB 184, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 831;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-304;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 718;

Laws 2017, LB340, § 3.

Enactment of rule which requires inmates of soldiers' home to pay a percentage of pension money for benefit of home is within discretionary power of Board of Control. Howell v. Sheldon, 82 Neb. 72, 117 N.W. 109 (1908).